Wyoming statutes. Title 10 Aeronautics
Article 2. Powers and Duties of Commission

§ 10-3-201.
Powers and duties generally.

The commission shall cooperate with:

The federal aviation administration;

Any existing federal aviation commission;

The cities and counties in Wyoming;

The chambers of commerce, commercial clubs and all aviation and business concerns interested in the development of aeronautics within the state.

In lieu of the requirements of this subsection, any airport sponsor may directly apply for, receive or disburse federal airport funds, and may also direct all construction and maintenance of the airport. The aeronautics commission may designate the airports to be built and maintained with the assistance of state or federal funds and is the sole authority to determine the disbursement of funds for the state’s airports. The aeronautics commission through the department shall be the authority in the state to apply for, or directly accept, receive, receipt for or disburse any funds granted by the United States government for airport construction or maintenance. A county, city, town or joint powers board may enter into an agreement with the division describing the terms and conditions of the agency in accordance with federal laws, rules and regulations and applicable laws of this state. The division may enforce the proper maintenance of these airports by the counties, cities and towns or joint powers boards as agreed in the contracts existing between the sponsors of the airports and the federal government. All construction and maintenance of these airports shall be under the direction of the department.

The department may offer engineering or other technical advice to any municipality, county, joint powers board or other qualified party in connection with the construction, maintenance or operation of airports. The commission shall encourage:

Development of private aviation schools;

Interest in private flying and privately-owned planes;

Study of aerospace engineering and allied subjects in the various schools of Wyoming and assist in forming classes in aviation;

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 104, § 2.

Sponsorship and participation in aerospace education workshops.

The commission shall establish policies as may be appropriate for the division to implement the decisions of the commission and the aeronautical purposes of this title and for the exercise of duties of the division. The commission shall provide assistance and advice to the director of the department regarding the division’s budget. The commission shall nominate candidates for the position of administrator of the division and upon request shall advise the department in regards to appointments within the division.

The commission shall assist communities in coordinating efforts, facilitating, recruiting and attracting and promoting the development, improvement and retention of commercial air service and accommodating military air service in the state. The assistance may include studying airline, aircraft, unmanned aircraft and vertical takeoff and landing aircraft profitability, route analysis, air fare monitoring and recommendations for legislative changes to enhance air services in the state.

There is created a new position in the office of the governor that shall coordinate with the commission to market and advocate airline service in Wyoming pursuant to subsection (e) of this section. The person appointed by the governor may be an at-will employee or an at-will contract employee and may be removed by the governor as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

The commission may promulgate reasonable rules, regulations and procedures and establish standards as necessary to carry out the functions of the division.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 2.

The commission shall promulgate reasonable rules governing where unmanned aircraft or vertical takeoff and landing aircraft may take off and land, giving consideration to public health and safety, aesthetics and the general welfare. Unless otherwise prohibited by or previously provided for in federal law, the commission may also promulgate reasonable rules governing the operation of unmanned aircraft or vertical takeoff and landing aircraft. In promulgating any rules under this subsection, the commission shall coordinate with the appropriate industry in Wyoming and political subdivisions of the state. The commission shall not have the power to regulate unmanned aircraft or vertical takeoff and landing aircraft operation in navigable airspace.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 64, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 33-102; Laws 1946, Sp. Sess., ch. 21, § 1; 1949, ch. 19, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 10-16; W.S. 1977, §

10-2-101

; Laws 1978, ch. 22, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 2003, ch. 104, §§ 1, 2; 2005, ch. 207, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 2; ch. 116, §
1; 2017 ch. 170, § 1, effective March 6, 2017; 2018 ch. 104, § 1, effective March 14, 2018.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (c)(iii), substituted “aerospace engineering” for “aeronautical engineering,” and added (c)(v).

The 2008 amendments.

The first 2008 amendment, by ch. 44, §
2, repealed former (h), pertaining to various reporting requirements to the legislature and legislative committees.

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

The second 2008 amendment, by ch. 116, §
1, made a stylistic change.

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

The 2017 amendment

, near the end of (e) added “an unmanned aircraft”
preceding “profitability, route analysis”; added (j);
and made a related change.

Laws 2017, ch. 170, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2017.

The 2018 amendment,

in (e), inserted “vertical
takeoff and landing aircraft” preceding “profitability”
and made a related change; in (j), inserted “or vertical takeoff
and landing aircraft” in three places,
in the second sentence,
substituted “under this subsection” for “governing
unmanned aircraft” following “promulgating any rules,”
and in the third sentence, inserted “appropriate” preceding
“industry.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 10-3-202.
Authority to provide air transportation to departments and agencies of state.

The division may provide air transportation to departments and agencies of state government directly, but may contract for the services under fractional ownership agreements or otherwise under conditions which are considered by the department or agency head to be urgent and to justify the air transportation and when justified within the limits of W.S. 9-4-205(e).

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 64, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 10-16.1; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1975, ch. 23, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 10-2-103; Laws 1978, ch. 22, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 2003, ch. 104, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “9-4-204(p) and” preceding “9-4-205(e).”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 10-3-203.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 79, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1949, ch. 20, § 1, pertained to the emergency authority of the aeronautics commission.

Laws 2004, ch. 79, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.

§ 10-3-204.
Termination of commission.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 2.

Effective January 1, 1997, the aeronautics commission created under this chapter shall continue with the powers, duties and authority it possessed prior to January 1, 1997.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 2; 1996, ch. 18, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 2.

The 2008 amendment

repealed former (a), pertaining to various reporting requirements to the legislature and legislative committees.

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 10-1-101(a)(ix).